Utah statutes.
32A-13-106 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Nuisances.
(1) (a)  Any room, house, building, structure, place, aircraft, vehicle,
vessel, or other conveyance, where alcoholic products are possessed, kept,
used, offered for sale, sold, given, furnished, supplied, received, purchased,
stored, warehoused, manufactured, adulterated, shipped, carried, transported,
or distributed in violation of this title and all alcoholic products,
packages, equipment, or other property kept or used in maintaining the same,
are common nuisances.
(b)  Any person who maintains or assists in maintaining any common nuisance is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(2)  If any person has knowledge, or has reason to believe that the person's
room, house, building, structure, place, aircraft, vehicle, vessel, or other
conveyance is occupied or used in violation of this title or commission rules
as described in this section, or allows  it to be so occupied or used, it is
subject to a lien for and may be sold to pay all fines and costs assessed
against the person guilty of the nuisance.  This lien may be enforced by
action in any court having jurisdiction.
(3)  Any action to abate any nuisance defined in this title  shall be brought
in the name of the department in any court having jurisdiction.  It shall be
tried as an action in equity.  No bond is required to initiate proceedings.
(4)  The court may issue a temporary writ of injunction, if it appears that
the nuisance exists, restraining the defendant from conducting or permitting
the continuance of the nuisance until the conclusion of the trial.  The court
may also issue an order restraining the defendant and all other persons from
removing or interfering with the alcoholic products, packages, equipment, or
other property kept or used in violation of this title or commission rules.
(5) (a)  In any action to abate or enjoin any nuisance, the court need not
find that the property involved was being unlawfully used at the time of the
hearing.
(b)  On finding that the material allegations of the petition or complaint are
true, the court shall order that no alcoholic product may be possessed, kept,
used, offered for sale, sold, given, furnished, supplied, received, purchased,
stored, warehoused, manufactured, adulterated, shipped, carried, transported,
or distributed in the room, house, building, structure, place, aircraft,
vehicle, vessel, or other conveyance or in any part of these.
(c)  Upon judgment of the court ordering abatement of the nuisance, the court
may order that the premises or conveyance in question  may not be occupied or
used for any purpose for one year, except under Subsection (5)(d).
(d)  The court may permit the premises or conveyance to be occupied or used if
its owner, lessee, tenant, or occupant gives bond in an appropriate amount
with sufficient surety, approved by the court, payable to the state of Utah,
and on the conditions that alcoholic products will not be present in or on the
premises or the conveyance, and that payment of all fines, costs, and damages
that may be assessed for any violation of this title or commission rules upon
the property will be made.
(6)  If a tenant of any premises uses the premises or any part of them in
maintaining a common nuisance as defined in this section, or knowingly permits
use by another, the lease is rendered void and the right to possession reverts
to the owner or lessor who is entitled to the remedy provided by law for
forcible detention of the premises.
(7)  Any person who knowingly permits any building or premises owned or leased
by the person, or under the person's control, or any part of any building or
premises, to be used in maintaining a common nuisance as defined in this
section, or who, after being notified in writing by a prosecuting officer or
any citizen of the unlawful use, and who fails to take all proper measures,
either to abate the nuisance or to remove the person or persons from the
premises, is guilty of assisting in the maintaining of the nuisance as
provided in Section 76-10-804.
